Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2891.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; Arizona department of housing; grants; tribal housing infrastructure and workforce development; exemption A. The sum of $15,000,000 is appropriated from the housing trust fund established by section 41-3955, Arizona Revised Statutes, in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Arizona department of housing for grants for tribal housing infrastructure and workforce development. B. The monies appropriated in subsection A of this section shall be used to: 1. Fund infrastructure necessary for housing development, including water, sewer and power. 2. Support apprenticeships and training for tribal members in construction trades. 3. Allow partnerships with tribal housing authorities. C. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.